Florida, session 2026, HB751.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (i) of subsection (1) of section
255.065, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
255.065 Public-private partnerships.—
(1) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
(i) "Qualifying project" means:
1. A facility or project that serves a public purpose,
including, but not limited to, any ferry or mass transit
facility, vehicle parking facility, airport or seaport facility,
rail facility or project, fuel supply facility, oil or gas
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb751-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 751 2026
pipeline, medical or nursing care facility, recreational
facility, sporting or cultural facility, or educational facility
or other building or facility that is used or will be used by a
public educational institution, or any other public facility or
infrastructure that is used or will be used by the public at
large or in support of an accepted public purpose or activity;
2. An improvement, including equipment, of a building that
will be principally used by a public entity or the public at
large or that supports a service delivery system in the public
sector;
3. A water, wastewater, or surface water management
facility or other related infrastructure;
4. A coastal resiliency project as defined in s.
380.0934(1); or
5.4. Notwithstanding any provision of this section, for
projects that involve a facility owned or operated by the
governing board of a county, district, or municipal hospital or
health care system, or projects that involve a facility owned or
operated by a municipal electric utility, only those projects
that the governing board designates as qualifying projects
pursuant to this section.
Section 2. Section 380.0934, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
380.0934 Public-private partnerships for coastal
resiliency projects.—
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb751-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 751 2026
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Coastal resiliency project" means:
1. Planning, contracting, and executing a project to
address flooding and sea level rise in a coastal or inland
community in this state under s. 380.093(5);
2. Public infrastructure repair and upgrades to seawalls
and stormwater drainage; and
3. Resiliency measures designed to withstand extreme
weather, mitigate flooding, and prevent coastal erosion,
including:
a. Acquisition of at-risk coastal and flood-prone
properties;
b. Acquisition of properties in areas at high risk of
flooding;
c. Infrastructure hardening and development of natural
barriers;
d. Construction of large-scale seawalls, levees, and
elevated flood barriers; or
e. Expansion and restoration of natural protective
systems.
(b) "Department" means the Department of Environmental
Protection.
(c) "Public-private partnership" means a coastal
resiliency project entered into by the department under s.
255.065.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb751-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 751 2026
(2) The department has the exclusive authority to execute
coastal resiliency projects through public-private partnerships
under s. 255.065.
(3) To encourage investment from the private sector in
coastal resiliency projects, the department may:
(a) Enter into long-term revenue-sharing agreements.
(b) Provide expedited permitting for construction.
(c) Seek comments from local governments and the public
during project planning and execution and incorporate actions
responsive to such comments into the project.
(d) Engage in-state vocational schools and apprenticeship
programs to train workers in specialized resiliency
construction.
(4) The department shall publish on its website biennial
progress reports for each coastal resiliency project funded
through a public-private partnership, including project
milestones, expenditures, and public benefits. The department
shall also create and maintain on its website an online
dashboard for real-time updates on project execution.
Section 3. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb751-00